District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-3611

Injunctions.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 629, Pub. L. 88-503, § 12
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(11) (B)
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(a)(2), 44 DCR 1730
Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 804(a), 47 DCR 7837

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2611.
1973 Ed., § 2-2411.